Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB145.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 190.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Every retail installment contract shall:
1. Be in writing in at least eight (8) point type;
2. Contain all the agreements of the parties;
3. Be signed by the retail buyer; and
4. Require a copy thereof to be furnished to the retail buyer at the time of the execution of the
contract.
(b) A retail installment contract need not appear on a single page and a contract that includes a provision
incorporating agreements that appear after the buyer's signature, including without limitation, terms,
and conditions on the back or on subsequent pages, shall be deemed in compliance with KRS
446.060(1).
(c) No provisions for confession of judgment, power of attorney therefor, or wage assignment contained in
any retail installment contract shall be valid or enforceable.
(d) 1. The holder of a retail installment contract may collect a delinquency and collection charge[ on
each installment in arrears for a period not less than ten (10) days] in an amount not in excess of
five percent (5%) of each installment or fifteen dollars ($15), whichever is greater, for each
installment in arrears for a period not less than:
a. Three (3) days for installment periods that are less than twenty-eight (28) days; or
b. Ten (10) days for installment periods that are twenty-eight (28) days or longer.
2. In addition to such delinquency and collection charge, the retail installment contract may provide
for the payment of reasonable attorneys' fees where such contract is referred to an attorney not a
salaried employee of the holder of the contract for collection, plus the court costs.
(e) Unless notice has been given to the retail buyer of actual or intended assignment of a retail installment
contract, payment thereunder or tender thereof made by the retail buyer to the last known holder of such
contract shall be binding upon all subsequent holders or assignees.
(f) Upon written request from the retail buyer, the holder of the retail installment contract shall give or
forward to the retail buyer a written statement of the total amount unpaid under such contract. A retail
buyer shall be given a written receipt for any payment when made in cash.
(2) The retail installment contract shall contain the following:
(a) The cash sale price of the motor vehicle which is the subject matter of the retail installment sale;
(b) The amount of the retail buyer's down payment, whether made in money or goods, or partly in money
or partly in goods;
(c) The difference between paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection;
(d) 1. Amount, if any, included for insurance and other benefits; and
2. Types of coverage and benefits;
(e) Official fees as defined in KRS 190.090;
(f) Any amounts eligible for inclusion in the cash sale price as defined in KRS 190.090 that the seller elects
to separately itemize; and
(g) Principal balance, which is the sum of paragraphs (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) A retail installment contract is deemed in compliance with subsection (2) of this section if it satisfies the
requirements of the Truth in Lending Act that would apply to a retail installment contract within the Truth in
Lending Act's scope, regardless of whether the Truth in Lending Act would apply to the retail installment sale
at issue.
(4) The amount, if any, included for insurance, shall not exceed the premiums chargeable in accordance with
applicable rate filings made with the commissioner of insurance. Every retail seller or sales finance company,
if insurance on the motor vehicle is included in a retail installment contract shall within thirty (30) days after
execution of the retail installment contract send or cause to be sent to the retail buyer a policy or policies or
certificate of insurance, which insurance shall be written by a company authorized to do business in this state,
clearly setting forth the amount of the premium, the kind or kinds of insurance and the scope of the coverage
and all the terms, exceptions, limitations, restrictions and conditions of the contract or contracts of the
insurance. The buyer of a motor vehicle under a retail installment contract shall have the privilege of
purchasing such insurance from an agent or broker of his own selection and of selecting an insurance company
acceptable to the seller; provided, however, that the inclusion of the insurance premium in the retail
installment contract when the buyer selects the agent, broker or company, shall be optional with the seller. If
any such policy is canceled, the unearned insurance premium refund received by the holder of the contract
shall be credited to the final maturing installments of the retail installment contract. For purposes of this
subsection, single interest insurance insuring the retail seller or sales finance company shall not be considered
insurance on the motor vehicle. Neither a copy of the policy nor a certificate of insurance of this type of
insurance shall be sent to the retail buyer.
(5) Any sales finance company hereunder may purchase or acquire from any retail seller any retail installment
contract on such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between them. No filing of the assignment, no
notice to the retail buyer of the assignment, and no requirement that the retail seller shall be deprived of
dominion over the payments thereunder or the goods covered thereby if repossessed by the retail seller shall be
necessary to the validity of a written assignment of a retail installment contract as against creditors, subsequent
purchasers, pledgees, mortgagees, and lien claimants of the retail seller.
(6) An acknowledgment in the body of the retail installment contract by the retail buyer of the delivery of a copy
thereof shall be conclusive proof of delivery in any action or proceeding by or against any assignee of a retail
installment contract.
(7) (a) A "debt cancellation agreement" is a written provision in a retail installment contract, or separate
addendum thereto, which provides for cancellation of all or part of an obligation of the buyer or obligor
upon the occurrence of a specified event.
(b) In accordance with subsection (2)(d) of this section, a debt cancellation agreement shall be itemized by
type on the retail installment contract and considered an "other benefit" for which the seller, sales
finance company, or other holder may charge the buyer or obligor.
(c) A debt cancellation agreement shall not be considered a contract of, or for, insurance.
Section 2. KRS 371.270 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The holder of any retail installment contract, if it so provides, may collect a delinquency and collection charge
on each installment in default for a period of more than ten (10) days in the amount not to exceed five (5%)
percent of each installment or fifteen dollars ($15)[ten dollars ($10)], whichever is greater[, provided that a
minimum charge of one dollar ($1) may be made, or, in lieu thereof, interest after maturity on each such
installment not to exceed the highest lawful contract rate].
(2) The holder of a retail installment contract upon request by the buyer, may agree to an amendment thereto to
extend or defer the scheduled due date of all or any part of any installment or installments or to renew, restate
or reschedule the unpaid balance of the contract, and may collect for same a refinance charge not to exceed an
amount ascertained as provided under either of the following optional methods of computation:
Option I. The refinance charge may be computed on the amount of the scheduled installment or
installments extended or deferred for the period of extension or deferment at the rate of one and one-
half percent (1.5%) per month; provided that a minimum deferment charge of one dollar ($1) shall be
permitted. Such amendment may also include payment by the buyer of the additional cost to the holder
of premiums for continuing in force any insurance coverages provided for in the contract until the end
of such deferral period, and of any additional necessary official fees.

CHAPTER 55 3
Option II. The refinance charge may be computed as follows: The sum of the unpaid balance as of the
refinancing date and the cost for any insurance and other benefits incidental to the refinancing, and for
any additional necessary official fees and any accrued delinquency and collection charges, after
deducting a refund credit as for prepayment pursuant to subsection (2) of KRS 371.260, shall constitute
a principal balance for such refinancing on which the refinance charge may be computed for the term of
the refinanced contract at the applicable rate for finance charges. Acquisition costs under the refund
schedule in subsection (2) of KRS 371.260 shall not apply in calculating refinance charges.
(3) The amendment to the contract must be confirmed in a writing signed by the holder. The writing shall set forth
the terms of the amendment and the new due dates and amounts of the installments, and shall either be
delivered to the buyer or mailed to him at his address as shown on the contract. Said writing together with the
original contract and any previous amendments thereto shall constitute the retail installment contract.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version